Indiana, session 2026, SB129.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 24-4-27 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]:
Chapter 27. Verifiable Parental Consent for Social Media
Sec. 1. In enacting this chapter, the general assembly finds and
declares that it is the policy of the state to recognize the unique and
evolving risks to the health, safety, and well-being of children who
have unrestricted access to social media. Suicide is the leading
cause of death for children between fourteen (14) and fifteen (15)
years of age and the second leading cause of death for other teens.
Further, twenty percent (20%) of children between twelve (12) and
seventeen (17) years of age suffer from depression. Many experts
have identified a strong correlation between the use of social media
and the increase in suicide and depression among children.
Accordingly, the general assembly finds that it has a compelling
governmental interest to appropriately regulate a child's access to
social media while also recognizing the fundamental rights of free
2026 IN 129—LS 6527/DI 149


speech and of a parent to make decisions about the upbringing of
the parent's child.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "minor user" means an
individual less than sixteen (16) years of age.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "person" has the meaning set
forth in IC 24-4-23-6.
Sec. 4. (a) As used in this chapter, "social media" means a
website or other Internet based application that allows a person to
create an account or profile to communicate or interact with other
users and:
(1) create content;
(2) share content and information; or
(3) view content and information that is shared by other users.
(b) The term does not include a website or other Internet based
application that:
(1) a user accesses for the sole purpose of interactive gaming;
(2) is designed to facilitate communication and operations
between employees, affiliates, or contractors of a business,
governmental entity, educational institution, or nonprofit
organization;
(3) facilitates only electronic mail;
(4) consists of content that is:
(A) preselected by the entity that owns, operates, or hosts
the website or other Internet based application; and
(B) not user generated;
including a chat or comment function connected to the
content described in this subdivision;
(5) facilitates crowdsourcing of content to create visual aids
such as charts, graphs, diagrams, and infographics; or
(6) allows a user to store digital data on a remote, Internet
based server.
Sec. 5. (a) As used in this chapter, "social media operator"
means a person that owns, operates, or hosts social media that is
accessible in Indiana.
(b) The term does not include a device manufacturer or
application store.
Sec. 6. As used in this chapter, "verifiable parental consent"
means consent of a minor user's parent or legal guardian that is
obtained through a method that is reasonably designed to ensure
that the person providing the consent is a parent or legal guardian
of the minor user.
Sec. 7. (a) A social media operator:
2026 IN 129—LS 6527/DI 149


(1) must not allow a minor user to view social media without
obtaining verifiable parental consent allowing the minor user
to view the social media; and
(2) shall use commercially reasonable methods to comply with
subdivision (1).
(b) A social media operator must identify if an account or
profile is created by a minor user without verifiable parental
consent and must require that verifiable parental consent is
obtained before social media is accessed through an account or
profile described in this subsection.
(c) A social media operator must:
(1) provide notice to the parent or legal guardian who has
provided verifiable parental consent under this section that
consent may be revoked at any time; and
(2) establish a procedure to allow a parent or legal guardian
to revoke an executed verifiable parental consent.
(d) A licensed application end user license agreement executed
between a device manufacturer and an application developer may
incorporate the requirements of subsection (b).
Sec. 8. A social media operator must use commercially
reasonable methods to secure all information collected and
transmitted under this chapter. Any information collected and
retained by a social media operator under this chapter must be
encrypted (as defined by IC 24-4-14-4).
Sec. 9. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), the attorney
general may bring an action against a social media operator if the
social media operator violates section 7 of this chapter.
(b) If the attorney general has not previously:
(1) brought an action against; or
(2) sent a notice of violation to;
a social media operator under this section, the attorney general
shall send a notice of violation. The notice sent under this
subsection must describe the violation of section 7 of this chapter.
The social media operator then has ninety (90) days from the date
on the notice to cure the violation and provide documentation to
prove that the violation has been remedied.
(c) If the social media operator does not remedy the violation
described in the notice required under subsection (b), the attorney
general may bring an action to obtain any of the following relief
against the social media operator:
(1) Injunctive relief.
(2) A civil penalty of not more than two hundred fifty
2026 IN 129—LS 6527/DI 149


thousand dollars ($250,000).
(3) The attorney general's reasonable costs of:
(A) the investigation of the violation; and
(B) maintaining the action.
Sec. 10. If the attorney general has reasonable cause to believe
that any person has violated this chapter, the attorney general may
issue a civil investigative demand under IC 4-6-3-3.
Sec. 11. In an action filed under section 9 of this chapter, any
information collected about a minor user is confidential. The clerk
of the court shall place all records of the minor user in an envelope
marked "confidential" inside the court's file pertaining to the
minor user. Records placed in the confidential envelope may only
be released to:
(1) the judge or any authorized staff member;
(2) a party and the party's attorney;
(3) the parent or legal guardian of a minor user who accessed
the social media; or
(4) any person having a legitimate interest in the work of the
court or in a particular case as determined by the presiding
judge or the judge's successor who shall consider the best
interests, safety, and welfare of the minor user.
Sec. 12. The provisions of this chapter are severable in the
manner provided by IC 1-1-1-8(b).
SECTION 2. IC 24-4.9-2-10, AS AMENDED BY P.L.98-2024,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. "Personal information" means:
(1) a Social Security number that is not encrypted or redacted;
(2) an individual's first and last names, or first initial and last
name, and one (1) or more of the following data elements that are
not encrypted or redacted:
(A) A driver's license number.
(B) A state identification card number.
(C) A credit card number.
(D) A financial account number or debit card number in
combination with a security code, password, or access code
that would permit access to the person's account; or
(3) information collected by an adult oriented website operator,
or their designee, under IC 24-4-23; or
(4) information collected by a social media operator, or their
designee, under IC 24-4-27.
The term does not include information that is lawfully obtained from
publicly available information or from federal, state, or local
2026 IN 129—LS 6527/DI 149


government records lawfully made available to the general public.
SECTION 3. IC 24-5-0.5-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.104-2024,
SECTION 42, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) A supplier may not commit an unfair,
abusive, or deceptive act, omission, or practice in connection with a
consumer transaction. Such an act, omission, or practice by a supplier
is a violation of this chapter whether it occurs before, during, or after
the transaction. An act, omission, or practice prohibited by this section
includes both implicit and explicit misrepresentations.
(b) Without limiting the scope of subsection (a), the following acts,
and the following representations as to the subject matter of a
consumer transaction, made orally, in writing, or by electronic
communication, by a supplier, are deceptive acts:
(1) That such subject of a consumer transaction has sponsorship,
approval, performance, characteristics, accessories, uses, or
benefits it does not have which the supplier knows or should
reasonably know it does not have.
(2) That such subject of a consumer transaction is of a particular
standard, quality, grade, style, or model, if it is not and if the
supplier knows or should reasonably know that it is not.
(3) That such subject of a consumer transaction is new or unused,
if it is not and if the supplier knows or should reasonably know
that it is not.
(4) That such subject of a consumer transaction will be supplied
to the public in greater quantity than the supplier intends or
reasonably expects.
(5) That replacement or repair constituting the subject of a
consumer transaction is needed, if it is not and if the supplier
knows or should reasonably know that it is not.
(6) That a specific price advantage exists as to such subject of a
consumer transaction, if it does not and if the supplier knows or
should reasonably know that it does not.
(7) That the supplier has a sponsorship, approval, or affiliation in
such consumer transaction the supplier does not have, and which
the supplier knows or should reasonably know that the supplier
does not have.
(8) That such consumer transaction involves or does not involve
a warranty, a disclaimer of warranties, or other rights, remedies,
or obligations, if the representation is false and if the supplier
knows or should reasonably know that the representation is false.
(9) That the consumer will receive a rebate, discount, or other
benefit as an inducement for entering into a sale or lease in return
2026 IN 129—LS 6527/DI 149


for giving the supplier the names of prospective consumers or
otherwise helping the supplier to enter into other consumer
transactions, if earning the benefit, rebate, or discount is
contingent upon the occurrence of an event subsequent to the time
the consumer agrees to the purchase or lease.
(10) That the supplier is able to deliver or complete the subject of
the consumer transaction within a stated period of time, when the
supplier knows or should reasonably know the supplier could not.
If no time period has been stated by the supplier, there is a
presumption that the supplier has represented that the supplier
will deliver or complete the subject of the consumer transaction
within a reasonable time, according to the course of dealing or the
usage of the trade.
(11) That the consumer will be able to purchase the subject of the
consumer transaction as advertised by the supplier, if the supplier
does not intend to sell it.
(12) That the replacement or repair constituting the subject of a
consumer transaction can be made by the supplier for the estimate
the supplier gives a customer for the replacement or repair, if the
specified work is completed and:
(A) the cost exceeds the estimate by an amount equal to or
greater than ten percent (10%) of the estimate;
(B) the supplier did not obtain written permission from the
customer to authorize the supplier to complete the work even
if the cost would exceed the amounts specified in clause (A);
(C) the total cost for services and parts for a single transaction
is more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750); and
(D) the supplier knew or reasonably should have known that
the cost would exceed the estimate in the amounts specified in
clause (A).
(13) That the replacement or repair constituting the subject of a
consumer transaction is needed, and that the supplier disposes of
the part repaired or replaced earlier than seventy-two (72) hours
after both:
(A) the customer has been notified that the work has been
completed; and
(B) the part repaired or replaced has been made available for
examination upon the request of the customer.
(14) Engaging in the replacement or repair of the subject of a
consumer transaction if the consumer has not authorized the
replacement or repair, and if the supplier knows or should
reasonably know that it is not authorized.
2026 IN 129—LS 6527/DI 149


(15) The act of misrepresenting the geographic location of the
supplier by listing an alternate business name or an assumed
business name (as described in IC 23-0.5-3-4) in a local telephone
directory if:
(A) the name misrepresents the supplier's geographic location;
(B) the listing fails to identify the locality and state of the
supplier's business;
(C) calls to the local telephone number are routinely forwarded
or otherwise transferred to a supplier's business location that
is outside the calling area covered by the local telephone
directory; and
(D) the supplier's business location is located in a county that
is not contiguous to a county in the calling area covered by the
local telephone directory.
(16) The act of listing an alternate business name or assumed
business name (as described in IC 23-0.5-3-4) in a directory
assistance data base if:
(A) the name misrepresents the supplier's geographic location;
(B) calls to the local telephone number are routinely forwarded
or otherwise transferred to a supplier's business location that
is outside the local calling area; and
(C) the supplier's business location is located in a county that
is not contiguous to a county in the local calling area.
(17) The violation by a supplier of IC 24-3-4 concerning
cigarettes for import or export.
(18) The act of a supplier in knowingly selling or reselling a
product to a consumer if the product has been recalled, whether
by the order of a court or a regulatory body, or voluntarily by the
manufacturer, distributor, or retailer, unless the product has been
repaired or modified to correct the defect that was the subject of
the recall.
(19) The violation by a supplier of 47 U.S.C. 227, including any
rules or regulations issued under 47 U.S.C. 227.
(20) The violation by a supplier of the federal Fair Debt
Collection Practices Act (15 U.S.C. 1692 et seq.), including any
rules or regulations issued under the federal Fair Debt Collection
Practices Act (15 U.S.C. 1692 et seq.).
(21) A violation of IC 24-5-7 (concerning health spa services), as
set forth in IC 24-5-7-17.
(22) A violation of IC 24-5-8 (concerning business opportunity
transactions), as set forth in IC 24-5-8-20.
(23) A violation of IC 24-5-10 (concerning home consumer
2026 IN 129—LS 6527/DI 149


transactions), as set forth in IC 24-5-10-18.
(24) A violation of IC 24-5-11 (concerning real property
improvement contracts), as set forth in IC 24-5-11-14.
(25) A violation of IC 24-5-12 (concerning telephone
solicitations), as set forth in IC 24-5-12-23.
(26) A violation of IC 24-5-13.5 (concerning buyback motor
vehicles), as set forth in IC 24-5-13.5-14.
(27) A violation of IC 24-5-14 (concerning automatic
dialing-announcing devices), as set forth in IC 24-5-14-13.
(28) A violation of IC 24-5-15 (concerning credit services
organizations), as set forth in IC 24-5-15-11.
(29) A violation of IC 24-5-16 (concerning unlawful motor
vehicle subleasing), as set forth in IC 24-5-16-18.
(30) A violation of IC 24-5-17 (concerning environmental
marketing claims), as set forth in IC 24-5-17-14.
(31) A violation of IC 24-5-19 (concerning deceptive commercial
solicitation), as set forth in IC 24-5-19-11.
(32) A violation of IC 24-5-21 (concerning prescription drug
discount cards), as set forth in IC 24-5-21-7.
(33) A violation of IC 24-5-23.5-7 (concerning real estate
appraisals), as set forth in IC 24-5-23.5-9.
(34) A violation of IC 24-5-26 (concerning identity theft), as set
forth in IC 24-5-26-3.
(35) A violation of IC 24-5.5 (concerning mortgage rescue fraud),
as set forth in IC 24-5.5-6-1.
(36) A violation of IC 24-8 (concerning promotional gifts and
contests), as set forth in IC 24-8-6-3.
(37) A violation of IC 21-18.5-6 (concerning representations
made by a postsecondary credit bearing proprietary educational
institution), as set forth in IC 21-18.5-6-22.5.
(38) A violation of IC 24-5-15.5 (concerning collection actions of
a plaintiff debt buyer), as set forth in IC 24-5-15.5-6.
(39) A violation of IC 24-14 (concerning towing services), as set
forth in IC 24-14-10-1.
(40) A violation of IC 24-5-14.5 (concerning misleading or
inaccurate caller identification information), as set forth in
IC 24-5-14.5-12.
(41) A violation of IC 24-5-27 (concerning intrastate inmate
calling services), as set forth in IC 24-5-27-27.
(42) A violation of IC 15-21 (concerning sales of dogs by retail
pet stores), as set forth in IC 15-21-7-4.
(43) A violation of IC 24-4-23 (concerning the security of
2026 IN 129—LS 6527/DI 149


information collected and transmitted by an adult oriented website
operator), as set forth in IC 24-4-23-14.
(44) A violation of IC 24-4-27 (concerning the security of
information collected and transmitted by a social media
operator), as set forth in IC 24-4-27-8.
(c) Any representations on or within a product or its packaging or
in advertising or promotional materials which would constitute a
deceptive act shall be the deceptive act both of the supplier who places
such representation thereon or therein, or who authored such materials,
and such other suppliers who shall state orally or in writing that such
representation is true if such other supplier shall know or have reason
to know that such representation was false.
(d) If a supplier shows by a preponderance of the evidence that an
act resulted from a bona fide error notwithstanding the maintenance of
procedures reasonably adopted to avoid the error, such act shall not be
deceptive within the meaning of this chapter.
(e) It shall be a defense to any action brought under this chapter that
the representation constituting an alleged deceptive act was one made
in good faith by the supplier without knowledge of its falsity and in
reliance upon the oral or written representations of the manufacturer,
the person from whom the supplier acquired the product, any testing
organization, or any other person provided that the source thereof is
disclosed to the consumer.
(f) For purposes of subsection (b)(12), a supplier that provides
estimates before performing repair or replacement work for a customer
shall give the customer a written estimate itemizing as closely as
possible the price for labor and parts necessary for the specific job
before commencing the work.
(g) For purposes of subsection (b)(15) and (b)(16), a telephone
company or other provider of a telephone directory or directory
assistance service or its officer or agent is immune from liability for
publishing the listing of an alternate business name or assumed
business name of a supplier in its directory or directory assistance data
base unless the telephone company or other provider of a telephone
directory or directory assistance service is the same person as the
supplier who has committed the deceptive act.
(h) For purposes of subsection (b)(18), it is an affirmative defense
to any action brought under this chapter that the product has been
altered by a person other than the defendant to render the product
completely incapable of serving its original purpose.
2026 IN 129—LS 6527/DI 149